Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.035

Compensation—Reimbursement.

Councilmembers shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the council in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2012 c 229 s 106.]